North Carolina, session 2025, HB711.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-130.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-130.3. Corporations.
A tax is imposed on the State net income of every C Corporation doing business in this State.
State at the rate of two and one-quarter percent (2.25%). An S Corporation is not subject to the
tax levied in this section. The tax is a percentage of the taxpayer's State net income computed as
follows:
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2025 2.25%
In 2026 2%
In 2028 1%
After 2029 0%."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
*H711-v-1*